Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.054

Health care data standards—Submittal of standards to legislature.

(1) To promote the public interest consistent with chapter 267, Laws of 1995, the department of health, in cooperation with the director of Washington technology solutions established in RCW 43.105.025, shall develop health care data standards to be used by, and developed in collaboration with, consumers, purchasers, health carriers, providers, and state government as consistent with the intent of chapter 492, Laws of 1993 as amended by chapter 267, Laws of 1995, to promote the delivery of quality health services that improve health outcomes for state residents. The data standards shall include content, coding, confidentiality, and transmission standards for all health care data elements necessary to support the intent of this section, and to improve administrative efficiency and reduce cost. Purchasers, as allowed by federal law, health carriers, health facilities and providers as defined in chapter 48.43 RCW, and state government shall utilize the data standards. The information and data elements shall be reported as the department of health directs by rule in accordance with data standards developed under this section.

(2) The health care data collected, maintained, and studied by the department under this section or any other entity: (a) Shall include a method of associating all information on health care costs and services with discrete cases; (b) shall not contain any means of determining the personal identity of any enrollee, provider, or facility; (c) shall only be available for retrieval in original or processed form to public and private requesters; (d) shall be available within a reasonable period of time after the date of request; and (e) shall give strong consideration to data standards that achieve national uniformity.

(3) The cost of retrieving data for state officials and agencies shall be funded through state general appropriation. The cost of retrieving data for individuals and organizations engaged in research or private use of data or studies shall be funded by a fee schedule developed by the department that reflects the direct cost of retrieving the data or study in the requested form.

(4) All persons subject to this section shall comply with departmental requirements established by rule in the acquisition of data, however, the department shall adopt no rule or effect no policy implementing the provisions of this section without an act of law.

(5) The department shall submit developed health care data standards to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 1995.

[ 2024 c 54 s 46; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 408; 1997 c 274 s 2; 1995 c 267 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 ss 101-109, 201-224, 406-408, 410, 501-507, 601, and 602: See note following RCW 43.105.007.

Effective date—1997 c 274: See note following RCW 41.05.021.

Captions not law—Severability—Effective dates—1995 c 267: See notes following RCW 43.70.052.